Louisiana, session 2026, HB772.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 329(A), 331(A)(1), 333, 335, and
336(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 329. Declaration of residence address for service; waiver of notice
A.(1) The placement of a valid mailing address and electronic mail address
pursuant to this Article is required in order for a party to receive the notice provided
in accordance with Article 333. A bond forfeiture judgment shall not be denied or
set aside because of the invalidity of the information provided by the defendant,
personal surety, commercial surety, or agent or bondsman as required by this Article
or for the failure to include the information required by this Article.
(2) The A defendant and personal surety signing who signs a bail
undertaking shall write provide the address at which each where he can be served
and mailing address, if different, provide his mailing address under their respective
signatures and along with the last four digits of their his social security number. The
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 772 ENROLLED
defendant and his counsel may, with the court's approval, by joint affidavit filed of
record in the matter in which the bail undertaking was given, appoint his counsel as
his agent to whom notice to appear can be sent. The appointment shall be
conclusively presumed to continue until the defendant, with court approval, files of
record an affidavit revoking or changing the appointment. The affidavit shall include
the address to which notice to appear can be sent.
(3) A personal surety who signs a bail undertaking shall write the address
where he can be served and, if different, provide his mailing address and the last four
digits of his social security number.
(4) A commercial surety shall place its proper valid mailing address and
electronic mail address on the face of the power of attorney used to execute the bail
undertaking and on the appearance bond.
(5) The agent or bondsman posting the bail undertaking shall place his
proper mailing address under his signature on the appearance bond.
(6) A bond forfeiture judgment shall not be denied or set aside because of
the invalidity of the information required by this Article or for the failure to include
the information required by the provisions of this Article.
* * *
Art. 331. Discharge of bail obligation
A.(1) Upon conviction in any case, the bail undertaking shall cease and the
surety shall be relieved of all obligations under the bail undertaking by operation of
law without the need to file a motion or other pleading. The provisions of this
Subparagraph shall not prejudice the state's right to obtain a judgment of bond
forfeiture after the elapse of one hundred eighty days following the execution of the
certificate that notice of warrant for arrest was sent pursuant to Article 334 333.
* * *
Art. 333. Failure to appear; issuance of arrest warrant notice and issuance of warrant
for arrest; effect on surety
A. If When, at the time fixed for any appearance as required by the court, the
defendant, who was properly noticed, fails to appear as required by the court, the
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 772 ENROLLED
court shall, on its own motion or on motion of the prosecuting attorney, immediately
issue a warrant for the arrest of the defendant. The clerk of court shall send a notice
of the warrant for arrest to the prosecuting attorney. The notice of the warrant for
arrest shall also be sent by United States mail or electronic means to the defendant
and the personal surety, if any. The notice of the warrant for arrest shall be delivered
to the bail agent and the commercial surety through electronic means, or certified
mail, return receipt requested, within sixty days of the defendant's failure to appear.
B. Notice of a bench warrant shall be sent to the addresses provided pursuant
to Article 329. The notice to the commercial surety and the bail agent shall include
the power of attorney number used to execute the bail undertaking. Failure to
include the power of attorney number shall not affect the validity or enforcement of
a resulting judgment. After sending the notice of warrant for arrest, the clerk of court
shall execute a certificate that notice was sent and shall place the certificate and
either the proof of certified mailing or confirmation of electronic service in the
record.
C. Failure to send notice of the bench warrant to the commercial surety and
the bail agent within sixty days of the defendant's failure to appear shall release the
surety of all obligations under the bail undertaking.
* * *
Art. 335. Rule to show cause; bond forfeiture
A. If the defendant fails to make an appearance and has not been surrendered
or constructively surrendered within one hundred eighty days of the execution of the
certificate that notice of warrant for arrest was sent, the prosecuting attorney may file
a rule to show cause requesting that a bond forfeiture judgment be rendered.
B. The rule to show cause shall be mailed to the defendant, and served on all
other parties against whom a judgment is sought. The rule to show cause, and shall
be set for a contradictory hearing.
C. The time period for filing a rule to show cause to obtain a judgment of
bond forfeiture shall be within five years after the notice of warrant for arrest is sent.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 772 ENROLLED
D. For warrants issued prior to August 1, 2024, the rule to show cause
requesting a bond forfeiture shall be filed no later than August 1, 2028. The state's
right to file a rule to show cause to obtain a judgement of bond forfeiture is
perempted if the rule to show cause is filed after August 1, 2028, and the surety shall
be released of all obligations with respect to the bail undertaking.
E. The five-year time period established by this Article is peremptive and is
the exclusive prescriptive and peremptive period applicable to the filing of a rule to
show cause to obtain a judgment of bond forfeiture. Upon the expiration of the
five-year period, the right to file a rule to show cause to obtain a judgment of bond
forfeiture is extinguished, and no court shall render a judgment of bond forfeiture on
a rule to show cause filed after the expiration of the five-year time period. The
general prescriptive periods provided in the Civil Code and any other general
prescriptive or peremptive periods do not apply to the filing of a rule to show cause.
Art. 336. Proof necessary at bond forfeiture hearing
A. The court at a contradictory hearing shall forfeit the bail undertaking and
sign a judgment of bond forfeiture upon proof of all of the following:
* * *
(3) Notice to the defendant and the surety as required by Article 334 333.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 15:574.15(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§574.15. Power of elected state, parochial, or municipal officials to parole persons
arrested for violation of municipal ordinances
A.(1) Every elected officer of the state or any parish or municipality in the
state shall have the power to parole a person who is under arrest and detention for the
violation of any criminal or quasi criminal ordinance, not enumerated in Paragraph
(2) of this Subsection, of any municipality in any parish, within the territorial
jurisdiction of the state or parish elected officer, and within the municipality wherein
the municipal officer exercises his jurisdiction, whenever any municipality has a
population of more than three hundred thousand persons, based on the latest federal
decennial census. Nothing in this Subsection shall prohibit or impede judges
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 772 ENROLLED
exercising criminal jurisdiction in district, municipal, or traffic court to fix bail as
guaranteed and authorized by Louisiana Constitution Article I, Section 18 and Code
of Criminal Procedure Article 333 314.
* * *
Section 3. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 334 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.